District of Columbia statutes.
34-1605

Daily inspections.

Daily inspections, Sundays excepted, shall be made at any time after 12:00 noon and before 12:00 midnight, in the discretion of the Inspector of Gas and Meters.

June 23, 1874, 18 Stat. 278, ch. 480, § 5
Mar. 3, 1893, 27 Stat. 543, ch. 199
Gas and electric corporations, Public Service Commission powers and duties, see § 34-301.
1981 Ed., § 43-1104.
1973 Ed., § 43-1204.